Maine, session 132, LD904.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §565, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 499, §2 and affected by
§26, is amended to read:
3. Fees for services. The department shall establish by rule a schedule of charges for
services rendered by the Health and Environmental Testing Laboratory based on the
average costs for those services. The department shall establish services essential to the
public health. These services must be provided free to residents of the State. The schedule
of charges must exempt from fees testing for substance use or to determine a blood-alcohol
or drug concentration level or for analysis of a substance that is suspected of being an illegal
drug when such testing or analysis is conducted pursuant to a criminal investigation.